Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,106
Communication of prescription, chart order, or refill authorization; limitation.

An employee or agent of a prescribing practitioner may communicate a prescription, chart order, or refill authorization issued by the prescribing practitioner to a pharmacist or a pharmacist intern except for an emergency oral authorization for a controlled substance listed in Schedule II of section 28-405. An employee or agent of a prescribing practitioner may communicate a refill authorization issued by the prescribing practitioner to a pharmacy technician.

Laws 2015, LB37, § 57;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 77.